Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB161.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) Except as provided further, on and after July 1, 2025,
no state agency shall seek or implement any public assistance program
waiver or other authorization from the federal government, including, but
not limited to, a medicaid state plan, state plan amendment, state
demonstration or a waiver pursuant to section 1115 or 1915 of the federal
social security act, that would expand eligibility for any public assistance
program to any additional individuals or class of individuals or would
increase any cost to the state unless the legislature expressly consents to,
and approves of, such waiver or other authorization by an act of the
legislature. The legislative coordinating council, as provided in K.S.A.
46-1202, and amendments thereto, may approve such waiver or other
authorization when the legislature is not in session. The provisions of
this paragraph section shall not affect any state plan amendment or waiver
program already being implemented prior to July 1, 2025.
(b) On and after July 1, 2025, no state agency shall seek or
implement any change to funding structures, day services or targeted
case management services for persons with intellectual or developmental
disabilities unless the legislature expressly consents to, and approves of,
such change by an act of the legislature.
(c) For purposes of this section:
(1) "Public assistance program" means any assistance under K.S.A.
39-709, and amendments thereto; and
(2) "state agency" means the same as defined in K.S.A. 75-3701, and
amendments thereto.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.